Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 18

Department of Health

4-3-1801. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of health.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 472, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The department of health, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, see Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Acts 2015, ch. 18, § 3 provided that the Department of Health shall appear before the Government Operations Joint Evaluation Committee on Education, Health and General Welfare no later than December 31, 2015, to update the Committee on the Department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the November 2014 performance audit report.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of health, §4-3-101.

Department representatives as ex officio members of child sexual abuse task force, §37-1-603.

Organization, powers and duties of department, title 68, ch. 1.

4-3-1802. Commissioner.

The department of health shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of health.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a32; Code 1932, § 257; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 472, § 6.

4-3-1803. Powers and duties.

The department of health has the power to:

Have general supervision of the interest relating to the health and lives of the people of the state;

Act in an advisory capacity relative to the public water supply, water purification works, sewerage systems, sewerage treatment works, and exercise supervision over nuisances growing out of the operation of such water and sewerage works, and make, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations relating to such nuisances;

Make such sanitary investigations as may from time to time be deemed necessary for the preservation and improvement of public health;

Make investigations and inquiries with respect to the causes of disease, especially epidemics, investigate the causes of mortality, and the effect of localities and other conditions on the public health, and make such other sanitary investigations as may be deemed necessary for the preservation and improvement of the public health;

Keep informed of the work of the local health officers and agencies throughout the state;

Promote the information of the general public in all matters pertaining to public health;

Make sanitary, sewerage, health and other inspections and examinations for the charitable and penal institutions and the normal schools;

Inspect from time to time all hospitals and sanitaria and other institutions conducted by county, city or town authorities and report as to the sanitary conditions and interests of such hospitals, sanitaria and institutions to the official authority having jurisdiction over them;

Print, publish and distribute documents, reports, bulletins, certificates and other matter relating to the prevention of diseases, and the health and sanitary condition of the state;

Exercise all the rights, powers and duties relating to the subject of tuberculosis control and treatment set forth in title 68, chapter 9, and have custody and control of all reports, records and equipment appertaining thereto;

Exercise all the rights, powers and duties relating to the administration of the children's special services set forth in title 68, chapter 12, and have custody and control of all records, reports and equipment appertaining thereto;

Carry out the policies of the state as set forth in title 68, chapter 34, relative to family planning; and

Carry out the purposes and programs pertaining to alcoholism and drug dependence in title 68, chapter 24.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 46; Shan. Supp., § 373a107; Code 1932, § 325; Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 64, 65; 1939, ch. 144, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 325 (Williams, §§ 255.67, 255.68, 325); Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 52, § 5; Acts 1971, ch. 400, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-314; Acts 1983, ch. 472, § 7; 1993, ch. 234, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the bureau of environment in the department of health and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee environmental statutes (excluding title 68, chs. 14, 110 and 112) from the department of health to the department of environment and conservation, see Executive Order No. 42 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Commission on aging, commissioner as member, §71-2-104.